Hawaii statutes.
[§89E-8] Guidelines; development and
administration. [(a)] The departments of human resources development and
budget and finance shall develop and administer guidelines and time frames with
the exclusive representatives of affected public employees to implement the
voluntary severance benefits and special retirement benefits under this
chapter. The department of human resources development, the department of
labor and industrial relations, the employees' retirement system, and the
Hawaii employer-union health benefits trust fund shall work cooperatively to
ensure that briefings are provided prior to the implementation of any workforce
restructuring plan to educate the employees whose positions are being abolished
or who are directly affected by a reduction-in-force or workforce restructuring
plan.

[(b)] The department of human resources
development and the department of budget and finance shall report to the
legislature on any restructuring activities initiated as a consequence of this
chapter no later than twenty days prior to the convening of each regular
session beginning with the regular session of 2017.

The report shall include a description of the
abolished positions, an explanation as to how the new workforce structure,
including resulting service delivery changes, will more efficiently serve the
needs of the agency's clients, the cost of the benefit per participant, and the
total cost to the State. [L Sp 2016 2d, c 1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next